test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-4-nakatîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # X
      nakatîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+1SgO: nakatikawiyâni # when someone leaves me, when someone leaves me behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+2SgO: nakatikawiyani # when someone leaves you, when someone leaves you behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+3SgO: nakatihci # when someone leaves him/her, when someone leaves him/her behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+1PlO: nakatikawiyâhki # when someone leaves us, when someone leaves us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+12PlO: nakatikawiyahki # when someone leaves you and us, when someone leaves you and us behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+2PlO: nakatikawiyîko # when someone leaves you all, when someone leaves you all behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+3PlO: nakatihtwâwi # when someone leaves them, when someone leaves them behind
      nakatîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+4Sg/PlO: nakatimihci # when someone leaves another/others, when someone leaves another/others behind
      

      # Imp # Imm

      # 2Sg
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: nakasin # (you) leave me now, (you) leave me behind now
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: nakasinân # (you) leave us now, (you) leave us behind now
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: nakas # (you) leave him/her now, (you) leave him/her behind now
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: nakasik # (you) leave them now, (you) leave them behind now

      # 12Pl
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: nakatâtân # let you and us leave him/her now, let you and us leave him/her behind now
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: nakatâtânik # let you and us leave them now, let you and us leave them behind now

      # 2Pl
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: nakasik # (you all) leave me now, (you all) leave me behind now
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO: nakasinân # (you all) leave us now, (you all) leave us behind now
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: nakatihk # (you all) leave him/her now, (you all) leave him/her behind now
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: nakatihkwâw # (you all) leave them now, (you all) leave them behind now
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: nakasik # (you all) leave them now, (you all) leave them behind now
      

      # Imp # Del

      # 2Sg
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: nakasîhkan # (you) leave me later, (you) leave me behind later
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: nakasîhkâhk # (you) leave us later, (you) leave us behind later
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: nakatâhkan # (you) leave him/her later, (you) leave him/her behind later
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: nakatâhkanik # (you) leave them later, (you) leave them behind later

      # 12Pl
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: nakatâhkahk # let you and us leave him/her later, let you and us leave him/her behind later
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: nakatâhkahkik # let you and us leave them later, let you and us leave them behind later
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: nakatâhkanik # let you and us leave them later, let you and us leave them behind later

      # 2Pl
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: nakasîhkîk # (you all) leave me later, (you all) leave me behind later
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO: nakasîhkâhk # (you all) leave us later, (you all) leave us behind later
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: nakatâhkîk # (you all) leave him/her later, (you all) leave him/her behind later
      nakatîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: nakatâhkîkwâw # (you all) leave them later, (you all) leave them behind later
      
